Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.700

Death benefits.

(1) Except as provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested member who has not completed at least ten years of service dies, the amount of the accumulated contributions standing to such member's credit in the retirement system at the time of such member's death, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If there be no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death, such member's accumulated contributions standing to such member's credit in the retirement system, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse, then to such member's legal representatives.

(2) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at least ten years of service dies, the surviving spouse or eligible child or children shall elect to receive one of the following:

(a) A retirement allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.40.630, actuarially reduced by the amount of any lump sum benefit identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and actuarially adjusted to reflect a joint and one hundred percent survivor option under RCW 41.40.660 and, except under subsection (4) of this section, if the member was not eligible for normal retirement at the date of death a further reduction as described in RCW 41.40.630; if a surviving spouse who is receiving a retirement allowance dies leaving a child or children of the member under the age of majority, then such child or children shall continue to receive an allowance in an amount equal to that which was being received by the surviving spouse, share and share alike, until such child or children reach the age of majority; if there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive an allowance at the time of the member's death, such member's child or children under the age of majority shall receive an allowance share and share alike calculated as herein provided making the assumption that the ages of the spouse and member were equal at the time of the member's death;

(b) The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670; or

(c) For a member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and who dies after January 1, 2007, while honorably serving in the uniformed services of the United States in Operation Enduring Freedom or Persian Gulf, Operation Iraqi Freedom, an amount equal to two hundred percent of the member's accumulated contributions, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670.

(3) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at least ten years of service dies after October 1, 1977, and is not survived by a spouse or an eligible child, then the accumulated contributions standing to the member's credit, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid:

(a) To a person or persons, estate, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department; or

(b) If there is no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death, then to the member's legal representatives.

(4) A member who is killed in the course of employment, as determined by the director of the department of labor and industries, or a member who has left the employ of an employer due to service in the national guard or military reserves and dies while honorably serving in the national guard or military reserves during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, is not subject to an actuarial reduction under RCW 41.40.630. The member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.40.620.

[ 2009 c 226 s 12; 2007 c 487 s 8; 2003 c 155 s 7; 2000 c 247 s 1004; 1995 c 144 s 8; 1993 c 236 s 5; 1991 c 365 s 28; 1990 c 249 s 18; 1977 ex.s. c 295 s 11.]

NOTES:

Applicability—2003 c 155: See note following RCW 41.32.520.

Severability—1991 c 365: See note following RCW 41.50.500.

Findings—1990 c 249: See note following RCW 2.10.146.

Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 295: See notes following RCW 41.40.610.